Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Severed Mineral Interests of Unknown or Missing Owners

353.460.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

353.462

to

353.476

, the following definitions shall apply:

A “severed mineral interest” is any whole or fractional interest in any or all minerals which have been severed from the surface estate by grant, exception, reservation or other means.

An “unknown or missing owner” is any person vested with a severed mineral interest and whose present identity or location cannot be determined from the records of the county in which the land is located or by diligent inquiry in the vicinity of the owner’s last known place of residence, and shall include his unknown heirs, successors and assigns.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Mineral Law & Policy.

Comments, Severed Mineral Interests of Unknown or Missing Owners in Kentucky, 3 J.M.L. & P. 185 (1987-88).

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note, Braun, Rock of Ages: Why Kentucky’s Use of the Abandonment Test in Deciding the Ownership of Mineral Refuse Is Inadequate,97 Ky. L.J. 293 (2008).

353.462.
Jurisdiction in Circuit Court.

The Circuit Court of the county wherein the severed mineral interests sought to be leased, or the major portion thereof, is situated shall have jurisdiction of the proceedings authorized under KRS

353.464

through

353.476

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

353.464.
When court may declare trust and appoint trustee — Persons authorized to institute proceedings.

If the title to any severed mineral interest is vested in an unknown or missing owner and it appears that the development of the minerals will be advantageous to the owner, the Circuit Court of the county in which the minerals or the major portion thereof lies shall have the power to declare a trust therein, appoint a trustee for the unknown or missing owners and authorize the trustee to sell, execute and deliver a valid lease thereon on terms and conditions customary in the area for the minerals covered thereby and similarly situated. The lease shall continue in full force and effect after the termination of the trust unless the lease has previously expired by its own terms.

Proceedings for the appointment of a trustee may be instituted by any person:

Vested in fee simple with the surface estate overlying the particular minerals sought to be developed;

Vested in fee simple with an undivided interest in the particular minerals sought to be developed;

Vested in fee simple with the entire interest in the particular minerals sought to be developed under lands immediately adjacent and contiguous to those lands under which the same minerals are vested in unknown or missing owners; or

Vested with a valid and subsisting mineral lease, the lessor of which is a person defined under either paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 3, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Mineral Law & Policy.

Comments, Severed Mineral Interests of Unknown or Missing Owners in Kentucky, 3 J.M.L. & P. 185 (1987-88).

353.466.
Persons to be joined as defendants — Verified petition showing effort to locate owners — Advertisement and lis pendens notice, contents — Trustee ad litem.

The person seeking to impress a trust upon a severed mineral interest for the purpose of leasing and developing same shall join as defendants to the action all those persons having record title thereto who are unknown or missing and the unknown heirs, successors and assigns of all such persons. The persons named as defendants and who are the unknown or missing owners as defined herein, shall stand for and represent the full title and the whole interest of the unknown or missing owners in the severed mineral interest or estate or interest therein. All parties not in being who might have some contingent or future interest therein, and all persons whether in being or not in being, having any interest, present, future or contingent, in the severed mineral interests sought to be leased, shall be fully bound by the proceedings hereunder.

There shall be filed a verified petition specifically setting forth the efforts to locate and identify the unknown or missing owners of the interests to be leased and such other information known to the petitioner which might be helpful in identifying or locating the present owners thereof. There shall be attached to the petition as an exhibit thereto a certified copy of the instrument creating the original severance and such additional instruments as are necessary to show the vesting of title to the minerals in the last record owner thereof. The petitioner shall establish to the satisfaction of the court that a diligent effort has been made to identify and locate the present owners of said interests.

Service of process shall be as provided by the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure and there shall be filed a lis pendens notice in the county clerk’s office of the county wherein the mineral estate or the larger portion thereof lies. Immediately upon the filing of the petition, the petitioner shall advertise as provided in KRS Chapter 424. Both the advertisement and the lis pendens notice shall contain the names of all of the parties and their last known addresses, the date and recording data of the original deed or other conveyance which created the mineral severance, an adequate description of the land as contained therein, the source of title of the last known owners of the severed mineral interests and a statement that the action is brought for the purpose of impressing a trust authorizing the execution and delivery of a valid and present mineral lease for development of the particular minerals described in the petition. The court, in its discretion, may order advertisement elsewhere or by additional means if there is reason to believe that additional advertisement might result in identifying and locating the unknown or missing owners.

The court shall appoint a trustee ad litem, who shall be a licensed, practicing attorney, to represent the unknown or missing owners and their unknown heirs, successors and assigns. The trustee ad litem shall review the petition and file an answer and such other pleadings as are necessary and proper to represent fairly the interest of the unknown or missing owners. It shall be the duty of the trustee ad litem to make an independent inquiry and search for the purpose of identifying and locating the unknown or missing owners and he shall report to the court the results of the investigation. The court shall allow the trustee ad litem a reasonable fee for his services to be taxed as costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 4, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Mineral Law & Policy.

Comments, Severed Mineral Interests of Unknown or Missing Owners in Kentucky, 3 J.M.L. & P. 185 (1987-88).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Lis Pendens, § 312.00.

353.468.
If advantageous to unknown or missing owner, court may declare trust — Bond of trustee — Sale of lease — Trustee’s report — When court not to authorize trustee’s lease — Trustee to use percentage of funds to search for owner — Period during which unknown or missing owner may establish identity and title.

If, upon presentation to the Circuit Court of the petition, the answer of the trustee ad litem and the proof presented by the petitioner in such case, it appears to the court that development of the severed mineral interests will be advantageous to the unknown or missing owners, the court shall declare a trust in the lands or estate or interest therein, appoint a trustee therefor and authorize the trustee to sell, execute and deliver a valid mineral lease covering the severed mineral interests in and underlying the lands.

Should the court appoint a trustee pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall, in its decree, require the trustee to give a bond in favor of the owners of the severed mineral interest which is to be leased and shall fix the amount of the bond. The decree of the court shall further provide for all of the terms and provisions of the lease which the trustee is authorized to make. It shall be discretionary with the court as to whether or not the trustee’s sale of lease shall be public or private and the decree shall provide therefor, and if a public sale be authorized, the court shall in its decree fix and determine the notice to be given. The sale shall be for cash, payable on confirmation of sale. No appraisal shall be required.

The trustee shall proceed in compliance with the provisions of the decree to sell the lease authorized thereby, and after making the sale shall make a report thereof to the court. Upon filing the report, the court may hear evidence as to whether or not the sale price is reasonable, and if the court is satisfied with the sale and the amount received therefor, the sale shall be confirmed by the court and the lease shall be executed by the trustee with the approval of the court endorsed on the face thereof.

The court shall not authorize a trustee’s lease upon the severed mineral interest of any owner whose identity and whereabouts is known, or can be ascertained by diligent inquiry, or is discovered as a result of the action brought hereunder; and any such owner may intervene as a matter of right at any time prior to the entry of judgment approving the trustee’s lease, for the purpose of establishing his title to the severed mineral interests, and if the mineral owners claim is established to the satisfaction of the court, the court shall dismiss the action as to the intervenor’s interest at plaintiff’s cost.

The trustee shall collect the proceeds, if any, from the sale of the lease and hold and invest the same for the use and benefit of the unknown or missing owners. The court upon its own motion or upon motion of the trustee may authorize the trustee to expend an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the funds collected by the trustee for the purpose of instituting a search for the unknown or missing owners.

Within seven (7) years after the date of first commercial production of the severed mineral interests under the trustee’s lease, any person being an unknown or missing owner of the severed mineral interest or any undivided portion thereof, may petition the Circuit Court to redocket the action in which the trustee’s lease was sought and approved in accordance with subsection (3) of this section and may thereupon present such proof as the court may deem necessary to establish his identity and title to the severed mineral interest or any portion thereof. If the court finds that the unknown or missing owners have established their identity and title, the trustee shall be directed to distribute the funds in his hands attributable to the unknown or missing owners’ interest, and shall assign all future proceeds from said lease to the owners as their interests appear and shall deliver to the owners a recordable instrument documenting their title to the severed mineral interest, which instrument shall bear the endorsement and approval of the Circuit Court on the face thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 5, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Mineral Law & Policy.

Comments, Severed Mineral Interests of Unknown or Missing Owners in Kentucky, 3 J.M.L. & P. 185 (1987-88).

353.470.
When trustee may convey title in mineral interest to surface owner — Payment to surface owner — Final report of trustee — Termination of trust.

If the severed mineral interests which are the subject of a trustee’s lease executed and delivered in accordance with KRS 353.468(3) are produced commercially, and the owners of the severed mineral interests remain unknown or missing for a period of seven (7) years from the date of first production under the lease, the trustee shall file a motion with the court naming the then present surface owners as additional parties and require the surface owners to appear and present proof to the satisfaction of the court that they are vested with fee simple title to the surface estate. Upon a finding by the court that the surface estate is vested in fee simple in the surface owners, the court shall order the trustee to convey to the surface owners by recordable instrument the unknown or missing owners’ interest in the severed mineral interests, which conveyance shall be approved by endorsement by the court on the face thereof.

The trustee shall pay to the surface owners the funds which have accrued to the credit of the severed mineral interests to the date of his final report after payment of all allowable fees, expenses and court costs including a fee to be paid to the trustee in an amount determined by the court.

From and after the date of the conveyance from the trustee to the surface owners executed and delivered in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the surface owners shall be entitled to receive all proceeds of production attributable to the severed mineral interests.

Upon the delivery of the conveyance directed in subsection (1) of this section, and after the payment as directed in subsection (2) of this section, the trustee shall make his final report to the court, and upon approval thereof, the court shall order the trust terminated and the trustee and his bond discharged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Mineral Law & Policy.

Comments, Severed Mineral Interests of Unknown or Missing Owners in Kentucky, 3 J.M.L. & P. 185 (1987-88).

353.472.
Payment to surface owner when leased mineral never produced commercially.

If the leased minerals are never produced commercially during the term of the trustee’s lease, the trustee shall pay any proceeds accruing from the lease to the then surface owners upon the termination of the lease in accordance with its terms or upon the expiration of seven (7) years following the date of judgment authorizing the lease, whichever last occurs. The payments shall be made in the same manner and on the same conditions as expressed in KRS 353.470(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 7, effective July 15, 1982.

353.474.
Payment of attorneys’ fees, expenses, and court costs.

All attorneys’ fees, expenses, and court costs incident to the original proceedings authorized hereunder shall be paid by the lessee if a lease is executed pursuant hereto, and by the plaintiff if for any reason no lease is executed. Subsequent to entry of judgment, all allowable fees, expenses, and court costs shall be paid out of funds in the hands of the trustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 8, effective July 15, 1982.

353.476.
When action by unknown or missing owner is barred.

After the expiration of seven (7) years from the date of first commercial production of the severed mineral pursuant to the terms of the lease authorized hereunder, or the expiration of seven (7) years from the date of entry of judgment authorizing the lease in the event there is no commercial production, whichever date last occurs, no action may be brought by any unknown or missing owner to recover any past or future proceeds accrued or to be accrued from the lease herein authorized. After the expiration of seven (7) years from the date of first commercial production of the severed mineral pursuant to the terms of the lease authorized hereunder, no action may be instituted by any unknown or missing owner to recover any right, title or interest in and to the severed mineral interest subject to the lease.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 165, § 9, effective July 15, 1982.